Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB213.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local employee" means a person who is employed by a local law
enforcement agency who is not otherwise a local law enforcement official,
and a person who is employed by a local government who is not otherwise a
public official;
(b) "Local law enforcement agency" means:
1. A police department of a local government;
2. A sheriff's office;
3. County jails operating pursuant to KRS Chapter 441; and
4. Metropolitan correctional services departments operating under KRS
Chapter 67B;
(c) "Local law enforcement official" means an elected or appointed officer, or
peace officer, who oversees or serves within a local law enforcement
agency;
(d) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government,
charter county government, consolidated local government or unified local
government;
(e) "Public official" means the chief executive officer and members of the
legislative body of a local government ; and
(f) "Sanctuary policy" means an order, ordinance, resolution, or policy,
whether written or unwritten, that:
1. Limits or prohibits a local law enforcement official or local employee
from communicating or cooperating with:
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/10/2025 8:25 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1026
a. Authorized federal agencies or federal law enforcement officers
or agencies or officers of another state; or
b. Any other local law enforcement official or local employee;
to verify or report the immigration status of a person within this state;
2. Grants to illegal immigrants the right to lawful presence or status
within the boundaries of this state in violation of federal law;
3. Violates 8 U.S.C. sec. 1373 or 1644;
4. Restricts or imposes any conditions upon the local law enforcement
official's or local employee's cooperation or compliance with detainers
or other legal and valid requests from United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement to retain custody of an immigrant or to transfer
an immigrant to the custody of United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement or another authorized federal agency or federal
law enforcement officer;
5. Requires United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or
another federal law enforcement agency or federal law enforcement
officer, to obtain a warrant or demonstrate more than probable cause
before complying with detainers or other legal and valid requests from
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to maintain
custody of an immigrant or to transfer an immigrant to the custody of
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or another
authorized federal agency or federal law enforcement officer;
6. Prevents local law enforcement officials or local employees from
asking a person about his or her citizenship or immigration status; or
7. Prohibits a federal immigration officer or other federal law
enforcement officer, or a law enforcement official or local law
enforcement official, from entering a jail or other correctional facility
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/10/2025 8:25 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1026
to enforce federal immigration laws.
(2) A local government, local law enforcement agency, local law enforcement
official, public official, or local employee shall not enact, adopt, or otherwise
enforce any sanctuary policy.
(3) Any sanctuary policy adopted prior to or after the effective date of this Act that
violates this section shall be invalid, void, and unenforceable.
(4) (a) If a person subject to a United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement detainer is released from custody on or after the effective date
of this Act as a result of a sanctuary policy, and that person subsequently
commits an offense which would classify him or her as a violent offender
under KRS 439.3401, the victim, or the victim's family if the victim of the
crime dies or sustains serious physical injury as defined in KRS 500.080 as
a result of the crime, may file a civil action against the local government or
local law enforcement agency in a court of competent jurisdiction for
compensatory damages, punitive damages, costs, and attorney's fees.
(b) Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity that is afforded to local
governments and local law enforcement agencies, including but not limited
to immunity under the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States, are waived for purposes of this subsection.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/10/2025 8:25 AM Jacketed